Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.31 of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. All individual and group health insurance policies that
provide medical and surgical benefits shall provide the same
coverage and benefits to any individual who has been diagnosed with
epilepsy as the policy would provide coverage and benefits to an
individual who has not been diagnosed with epilepsy.
B. No insurer shall terminate coverage or refuse to renew an
individual's health insurance coverage solely based upon the
individual's diagnosis of epilepsy.
C. To reduce the risk of death from sudden unexpected death in
epilepsy (SUDEP), all individual and group health insurance policies
that provide medical and surgical benefits shall adopt medical
policies that provide coverage for medically necessary
neurostimulation devices if prescribed by a licensed physician who
is actively treating the enrollee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4294 Page 2